Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 2. State Parks.
Sec. 41.21.160.
Purpose of AS 41.21.160 — 41.21.167.

The purpose of AS

41.21.160

—

41.21.167

is to establish the state-owned land and water areas described in AS

41.21.161

as the Wood-Tikchik State Park.
The primary purposes of creating the Wood-Tikchik State Park are to protect the area’s fish and wildlife breeding and support systems and to preserve the continued use of the area for subsistence and recreational activities.
The state park is also created to protect the area’s recreational and scenic resources.
AS

41.21.160

—

41.21.167

are intended to close the described land and water to multiple-purpose use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and to dedicate it as a special purpose site in accordance with art. VIII, § 7 of the Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.460. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

Sec. 41.21.161.
Wood-Tikchik State Park established.

The state-owned or acquired land and water lying within the following parcel, containing approximately 1,428,320 acres, is designated as the Wood-Tikchik State Park: beginning at the SE corner of T7S, R54W, S.M., which is the true point of beginning; thence westerly to the NE corner of T8S, R58W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SE corner of T8S, R58W, S.M.; thence westerly to the SW corner of T8S, R58W, S.M.; thence northerly to the NW corner of T5S, R58W, S.M.; thence westerly to the SW corner of Section 34, T4S, R58W, S.M.; thence northerly to the NE corner of Section 4, T1S, R58W, S.M.; thence westerly to the SW corner of T1N, R57W, S.M.; thence northerly to the NW corner of T2N, R57W, S.M.; thence easterly to the NE corner of T2N, R57W, S.M.; thence northerly to the NW corner of T4N, R56W, S.M.; thence easterly to the SW corner of T5N, R55W, S.M.; thence northerly to the NW corner of T5N, R55W, S.M.; thence easterly to the NE corner of T5N, R55W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SE corner of T5N, R55W, S.M.; thence easterly to the NE corner of T4N, R54W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SE corner of T4N, R54W, S.M.; thence easterly to the NE corner of T3N, R53W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SE corner of T3N, R53W, S.M.; thence easterly to the NE corner of T2N, R52W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SW corner of T1N, R51W, S.M.; thence easterly to the NE corner of T1S, R52W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SE corner of T2S, R52W, S.M.; thence easterly to the NE corner of T3S, R51W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SE corner of T3S, R51W, S.M.; thence westerly to the NE corner of T4S, R53W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SE corner of T4S, R53W, S.M.; thence westerly to the NE corner of T5S, R54W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SE corner of T7S, R54W, S.M., which point is the true point of beginning.

All or part of the state-owned or acquired land and water within the following adjacent parcel, containing approximately 126,720 acres may be added to the Wood-Tikchik State Park by proclamation of the governor: beginning at the SE corner of T7S, R54W, S.M., which point is the true point of beginning; thence southerly to the SE corner of T8S, R54W, S.M.; thence westerly to the NE corner of T9S, R55W, S.M.; thence southerly to the SE corner of the NE quarter of T9S, R55W, S.M.; thence westerly to the SW corner of the NW quarter of T9S, R57W, S.M.; thence northerly to the NW corner of T9S, R57W, S.M.; thence westerly to the SE corner of T8S, R58W, S.M.; thence northerly to the NE corner of T8S, R58W, S.M.; thence easterly to the SE corner of T7S, R54W, S.M., which point is the true point of beginning.

Land lying within the parcels described in (a) or (b) of this section upon which there are valid entries or that is withdrawn for or selected by Native village or regional corporations under 43 U.S.C. 1610, 1611 and 1613 (P.L. 92-203, §§ 11, 12 and 14 of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act), is excepted from (a) and (b) of this section. However, if any land excepted under this subsection is subsequently relinquished to the state, it shall be included as part of the Wood-Tikchik State Park.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.470. Renumbered in 1983. In 1993, in the next to last clause of the legal description in (a) of this section, the designation of the range was changed from “R53W” to “R54W” to correct a manifest error in § 1, ch. 86, SLA 1978.

Administrative Code. —

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

Sec. 41.21.162.
Designation of management responsibility.

The land and water described in AS

41.21.161

is assigned to the department for control, maintenance, and development consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter. The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the management of fish and game resources in the Wood-Tikchik State Park, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.480(a). Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

Sec. 41.21.163.
Management Council created.

A seven-member Wood-Tikchik State Park Management Council is created and shall be appointed by the governor.
Management council members may, subject to appropriations, receive the same per diem and travel expenses authorized for members of state boards.
The governor shall appoint one member of the council from three nominations submitted to the governor by each of the following:

the village council of Koliganek;

the village council of New Stuyahok;

the village council of Aleknagik;

the city council of Dillingham;

the Bristol Bay Native Association, Inc.;

the commissioner of natural resources;

the commissioner of fish and game.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.480(b). Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 41.21.164.
Management plan.

The Wood-Tikchik State Park Management Council shall develop a management plan for the park with the advice and assistance of the department.
The management plan shall be presented at a public meeting before approval and implementation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1978)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.480(c). Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to amendment of the plan to conform with the 2019 amendment of AS

41.21.167

, see sec. 3, ch. 20, SLA 2019, in the 2019 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

Sec. 41.21.165.
Regulations.

The department shall consult with Department of Fish and Game and the management council before adoption of regulations governing the public use of the park.
The Department of Fish and Game shall consult with the department and the management council before adoption of regulations governing fish and wildlife management in the park. Regulations may not be adopted by either department without prior review at public hearings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.480(d). Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

Sec. 41.21.166.
Fish and wildlife breeding areas.

The fish and wildlife habitat breeding areas in the Wood-Tikchik State Park shall be managed to sustain the fish and wildlife resources of the park in perpetuity.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.480(e). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.167.
Compatible and incompatible uses.

The land and water areas described in AS

41.21.161

are not open to mineral entry under AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.275

.

The regulations adopted under AS

41.21.165

shall recognize that the current practice of traditional subsistence and recreational activities includes the use of small outboard motors and snow machines. Reasonable access by aircraft for recreational purposes shall be permitted.

Development and operation of a hydroelectric site at Lake Elva or Grant Lake is not considered an incompatible use.

Development and operation of campsites on or adjacent to major spawning and breeding areas are incompatible uses unless it can be shown by a preponderance of evidence that the fishery and wildlife habitat and breeding areas will not be adversely affected to a significant degree by the development and operation.

The development and operation of a hydroelectric site at the Nuyakuk River Falls is a compatible use if the development and operation

does not include a dam that fully spans a river;

maintains at least 70 percent of the daily upstream water flow of an affected river along the natural course of the river; and

after July 1, 2024, is licensed by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2019)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.490. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective August 17, 2019, added (e).

Sec. 41.21.170.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of AS

41.21.170

—

41.21.178

is to establish, subject to valid existing rights, the state-owned or acquired land and water described in AS

41.21.172

as the Shuyak Island State Park. In accordance with the covenants and deed restrictions set by the Kodiak Island Borough that support the basic tenets of the Alaska lifestyle, the primary purpose of establishing the Shuyak Island State Park is to preserve, protect, and enhance traditional public access to and use of the area’s natural resources for various activities including sport and subsistence hunting, sport, subsistence, and commercial fishing, and trapping.

Under the provisions of AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple purpose use only by act of the legislature. Because the area described in AS

41.21.172

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.170

—

41.21.178

are intended to close the described land and water to multiple purpose use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and to dedicate them as a special purpose site in accordance with art. VIII, § 7, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 167 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For Shuyak Island state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 16.

Sec. 41.21.172.
Designated state land and water.

The upland, shoreland, tideland, land underlying tidally influenced inland water, and water overlying this land, including both the surface and subsurface estate, owned or acquired by the state within the following described parcels are designated as the Shuyak Island State Park:

Township 17 South, Range 19 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 South, Range 20 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 South, Range 18 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 South, Range 19 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 South, Range 20 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 South, Range 21 West, Seward Meridian

Township 19 South, Range 19 West, Seward Meridian

Township 19 South, Range 20 West, Seward Meridian

Township 19 South, Range 21 West, Seward Meridian

Township 20 South, Range 19 West, Seward Meridian

Township 20 South, Range 20 West, Seward Meridian

Section 18

Section 19

Section 30;

Section 24

Section 25;

Section 6

Section 7

Section 20

Section 28

Section 29;

Section 1

Section 2

Section 4

Section 5

Sections 7-36;

Section 2

Section 3

Sections 9-11

Sections 13-17

Sections 19-36;

Section 36;

Sections 1-24

Sections 26-34;

Sections 1-30

Section 32: N1/2

Sections 33-36;

Section 1

Sections 12-14

Section 24

Section 25;

Section 4

Section 5

Section 6: N1/2, N1/2S1/2;

Section 1: N1/2, N1/2S1/2

Section 2: N1/2

Section 3: N1/2.

History.

(§ 1 ch 167 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 1997)

Sec. 41.21.174.
Designation of management responsibility.

The state land and water described in AS

41.21.172

are assigned to the department for control, maintenance, and development consistent with the purposes and provisions of AS

41.21.170

—

41.21.178

.

The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the management of fish and game resources in the Shuyak Island State Park, consistent with the sustained yield principle and the purposes and provisions of this chapter. The Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, and the commissioner of fish and game are responsible for adopting regulations governing uses of fish and game in accordance with AS 16. The fish and game habitat and breeding areas shall be managed to ensure that the fish and game resources of the park continue on a sustained yield basis. In managing the fish and game resources of the Shuyak Island State Park and adopting regulations governing uses of the fish and game, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, or the commissioner of fish and game may not permanently close any fishing, hunting, or trapping within the park unless the closure is implemented because of a biological emergency. A closure implemented because of a biological emergency (1) may continue in effect only as long as the biological emergency continues to exist, and (2) must be reevaluated on a regular basis, not less than annually, to justify that the closure continues to be necessary.

The department shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game before adoption of regulations governing public use of the Shuyak Island State Park.

The Department of Fish and Game shall consult with the department before adoption of regulations governing fish and game management in Shuyak Island State Park.

The regulations established under this section shall be adopted in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The commissioner shall permit reasonable camping within the Shuyak Island State Park on an extended basis on request.

Nothing in AS

41.21.170

—

41.21.178

prohibits the Department of Fish and Game from engaging in rehabilitation, enhancement, and development of fish and game habitat under AS 16.05 on land and water within the Shuyak Island State Park.

The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Fish and Game shall have necessary access for fish and game management, research, and enforcement purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 167 SLA 1984; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 28 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For Shuyak Island state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 16.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 167, SLA 1984, provides: “Subject to the availability of funds, the Department of Natural Resources shall construct public use cabins within the Shuyak Island State Park.”

Section 4, ch. 167, SLA 1984, provides: “The commissioner of natural resources shall identify the boundaries of the Shuyak Island State Park by posting each inland boundary described in AS

41.21.172

as enacted in sec. 1 of this Act or as added under sec. 2 of this Act at its beginning and its end and not less often than each one-eighth of a mile.”

Sec. 41.21.176.
Incompatible uses; access.

Except as provided in this section, the commissioner may designate by regulation incompatible uses within the land and water of the Shuyak Island State Park.

Possession and use of a weapon in the Shuyak Island State Park shall be allowed at all times and use of the weapon may be restricted only under extraordinary circumstances and only in such areas where public safety is threatened.

The commissioner may not restrict lawful sport, subsistence, or commercial fishing, sport or subsistence hunting, or trapping permitted under law or under a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game within the Shuyak Island State Park.

The commissioner shall allow traditional access to

Shuyak Island State Park for recreational purposes and for lawful sport, subsistence, and commercial fishing, sport and subsistence hunting, and trapping;

private land within the park.

If the commissioner determines that a use is incompatible with one or more other uses in a portion of the Shuyak Island State Park, the commissioner shall state

each determination of incompatibility;

the specific area where the incompatibility is determined to exist;

the time within which the incompatibility is determined to exist; and

the reasons for each determination of incompatibility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 167 SLA 1984; am §§ 6, 7 ch 28 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For Shuyak Island state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 16.

Sec. 41.21.178.
Additions to park.

Land and water outside of the boundaries established in AS

41.21.172

may be added to the Shuyak Island State Park only by an act of the legislature. The commissioner may not acquire land and water within the boundaries of the Shuyak Island State Park by eminent domain.

History.

(§ 1 ch 167 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 28 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under § 2(b), ch. 167, SLA 1984, the following land has been added to Shuyak Island State Park: T18S, R20W, S.M.: Secs. 26 and 34 — 36; T18S, R19W, S.M.: Sec. 31. Under § 2(d), ch. 167, SLA 1984, the following land has been added to Shuyak Island State Park: T19S, R20W, S.M.: Sec. 8, SE1/4, SE1/4, SE1/4, and Sec. 9.

Sec. 41.21.180.
Purpose of AS 41.21.180 — 41.21.183.

The purpose of AS

41.21.180

—

41.21.183

is to establish, subject to valid existing rights, the state-owned or acquired land described in AS

41.21.181

as the Point Bridget State Park. The primary purposes of establishing the Point Bridget State Park are to protect the area’s recreational and scenic resources and to preserve and enhance the continued use of the area for hunting and fishing and recreational activities.

The legislature recognizes the rights of the owners of the private land that adjoin the Point Bridget State Park established in AS

41.21.180

—

41.21.183

. The legislature further recognizes the value of the services provided by the owners of the adjacent land to the residents of the state. The establishment of the park will not impair the use of the private land by the owners of the private land or the right of a riparian owner of private land to seek title to accreted land.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 1988)

Sec. 41.21.181.
Point Bridget State Park established.

The state-owned land and water within the following described parcels and any land acquired by the state under AS

41.21.182

are established as the Point Bridget State Park:

All state land lying within the following unsurveyed sections:

Township 37 South, Range 63 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 10: E1/2

Section 11: excluding Native Allotment A-061005

Section 12: W1/2, excluding USS 2925, Interim Conveyance 408, and Native Allotment A-061005

Section 13: W1/2 and W1/2E1/2, excluding USS 1154, USS 1157, and Interim Conveyance 408

Section 14

Section 15: E1/2

Section 23: N1/2

Section 24: NE1/4, excluding Interim Conveyance 408 and the Glacier Highway right-of-way.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.21.182

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.21.182.
Purchase or exchange authorized.

If requested by an owner of land, the department may purchase or enter into an exchange under AS 38.50 if the purchase or exchange will improve access to the park, consolidate the ownership of land, or otherwise enhance the purposes of the park as expressed in AS

41.21.180

. Land acquired by the department under this subsection becomes a part of the Point Bridget State Park.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.21.180(c).
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.21.183.
Designation of management responsibility.

The state-owned land and water described in AS

41.21.181

is assigned to the department for control, maintenance, and development consistent with the purposes and provisions of AS

41.21.180

—

41.21.183

.

The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the management of fish and game resources in the Point Bridget State Park, consistent with the sustained-yield principle and the purposes and provisions of this chapter. The Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, and the commissioner of fish and game are responsible for adopting regulations governing uses of fish and game under AS 16. The fish and game habitat and breeding areas shall be managed to ensure that the fish and game resources of the park continue on a sustained-yield basis.

The department shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game before adoption of regulations governing public use of the Point Bridget State Park.

The Department of Fish and Game shall consult with the department before adoption of regulations governing fish and game management in the Point Bridget State Park.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.21.184.
Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For Chilkat state park and Point Bridget state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 12.

For special provisions, see 11 AAC 20, art. 18.

Sec. 41.21.185.
Purpose of AS 41.21.185 — 41.21.189.

The purpose of AS

41.21.185

—

41.21.189

is to establish, subject to valid existing rights including those rights created by the Afognak Island Road Use Agreement executed on July 24, 1991, and as amended from time to time, the state-owned or acquired land and water described in AS

41.21.186

as the Afognak Island State Park. The primary purposes of establishing the Afognak Island State Park are to protect the area’s recreational and scenic resources; to protect the area’s fish and wildlife habitat; to preserve and enhance the continued use of the area for sport and subsistence hunting and fishing, personal use fishing, trapping, recreational activities, and commercial fishing; and to restore and enhance resources and services injured by the Exxon Valdez oil spill.

Under the provisions of AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple purpose use only by act of the legislature. Because the area described in AS

41.21.186

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.185

—

41.21.189

are intended to close the described land and water to multiple purpose use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and to dedicate them as a special purpose site in accordance with art. VIII, sec. 7, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

The legislature recognizes the rights of the owners of the private land that adjoins the Afognak Island State Park established in AS

41.21.185

—

41.21.189

. The status of the land as a park will not impair the uses to which private land that adjoins the park may be put in the future.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For Afognak Island state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 13.

Sec. 41.21.186.
Afognak Island State Park established.

The upland, shoreland, tideland, land underlying tidally influenced inland water, and water overlying this land, including both the surface and subsurface estate, owned or acquired by the state within the following described parcels are established as the Afognak Island State Park:

Township 21 South, Range 16 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989

Township 22 South, Range 16 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989

Township 20 South, Range 17 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989

Township 21 South, Range 17 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989

Township 22 South, Range 17 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989

All of Township 23 South, Range 17 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989; and the supplemental plat for Section 3 accepted April 11, 1990, and filed April 19, 1990, and the supplemental plat for Section 19 accepted November 9, 1990, and filed November 23, 1990;

Township 21 South, Range 18 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989

Township 22 South, Range 18 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989

Township 23 South, Range 18 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989

Township 21 South, Range 19 West, Seward Meridian according to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management plat accepted December 6, 1989, and filed December 22, 1989

All of Alaska Tideland Survey No. 1474.

Section 19: Lots 1 — 3

Sections 30 — 31: (fractional) all;

Section 6: (fractional) all

Section 7: Lots 1 — 2

Sections 18 — 19: (fractional) all

Section 31: (fractional) all;

Section 32: (fractional) all;

Sections 6 — 8: (fractional) all

Section 13: (fractional) all

Section 17: (fractional) all

Section 18: all

Sections 19 — 20: (fractional) all

Sections 23 — 24: (fractional) all

Section 25: all

Section 26: (fractional) all

Sections 29 — 31: (fractional) all

Sections 33 — 35: (fractional) all

Section 36: all;

Section 1: all

Sections 2 — 5: (fractional) all

Sections 8 — 9: (fractional) all

Section 11: all

Section 12: (fractional) all

Sections 13 — 14: all

Section 17: (fractional) all

Sections 19 — 20: (fractional) all

Section 23: all

Sections 24 — 25: (fractional) all

Sections 26 — 29: all

Sections 30 — 31: (fractional) all

Sections 32 — 35: all

Section 36: (fractional) all;

Section 1: Lots 1 — 3

Sections 11 — 12: (fractional) all

Section 13: all

Section 14: (fractional) all

Section 15: Lots 1 and 2

Section 16: Lots 1 and 2

Section 17: Lot 1, excepting the property described as follows:

Commencing at the monument set for the northwest corner of Section 6, Township 21 South, Range 18 West, Seward Meridian, proceed South a distance of 10,560 feet along the westerly boundaries of Sections 6 and 7; thence proceed East along the section line common to Sections 7 and 18 a distance of 4,999 feet, more or less, to the protracted section corner common to Sections 7, 8, 17, and 18, said corner being the True Point of Beginning; thence continuing East a distance of 1,320 feet along the north boundary of Lot 1 of Section 17; thence South a distance of 2,640 feet; thence West a distance of 1,320 feet, more or less, to the westerly boundary of Lot 1 of Section 17; thence North a distance of 2,640 feet, more or less, along the westerly boundary of said Lot 1 of Section 17 to the True Point of Beginning; the foregoing exception having an area of 80 acres, more or les

Section 17: Lot 2: all

Sections 20 — 22: (fractional) all

Sections 23 — 29: all

Sections 31 — 36: all;

Section 36: Lot 2;

Section 1: Lot 1

Section 12: Lot 1

Section 13: Lots 1, 2, and 3

Sections 24 — 25: (fractional) all;

Sections 35 — 36: all

All of plat no. 93-40 within portions of Sections 26, 27, and 34, as filed in the Kodiak Recording District October 19, 1993;

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1994)

Sec. 41.21.187.
Designation of management responsibility.

The state land and water described in AS

41.21.186

is assigned to the department as a unit of the state park system for control, maintenance, and development consistent with the purposes and provisions of AS

41.21.185

—

41.21.189

.

The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the management of fish and game resources in the Afognak Island State Park, consistent with the sustained yield principle and the purposes and provisions of this chapter. The Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, and the commissioner of fish and game are responsible for adopting regulations governing uses of fish and game in accordance with AS 16. The fish and game habitat and breeding areas shall be managed to ensure that the fish and game resources of the park and habitat are maintained or enhanced.

The Department of Natural Resources shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game before adoption of regulations governing public use of the Afognak Island State Park.

The Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, and the commissioner of fish and game shall consult with the Department of Natural Resources before adoption of regulations governing fish and game use in the Afognak Island State Park.

Regulations under this section shall be adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Fish and Game shall have necessary access to the Afognak Island State Park for fish and game management, research, and enforcement purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1994)

Sec. 41.21.188.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner may designate by regulation incompatible uses within the land and water of the Afognak Island State Park.

Lawful use of a weapon in the Afognak Island State Park shall be allowed except in areas that may be closed for purposes of public safety by regulation by the commissioner.

The regulations governing public use of the Afognak Island State Park must provide reasonable access for lawful sport and subsistence hunting and fishing, personal use fishing, trapping, recreational uses, and commercial fishing. Except to protect public safety, the commissioner may not restrict the exercise of sport or subsistence hunting or fishing, personal use fishing, trapping, or commercial fishing permitted under law or under a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game within the Afognak Island State Park.

The commissioner may not designate as an incompatible use a use permitted by the Afognak Island Road Use Agreement executed on July 24, 1991, as amended.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For Afognak Island state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 13.

Sec. 41.21.189.
Additions to park.

Land and water outside of the boundaries established under AS

41.21.186

may be added to the Afognak Island State Park only by an act of the legislature. The commissioner may acquire land and water within the boundaries of the Afognak Island State Park except by eminent domain.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1994)

Sec. 41.21.190.
Purpose of AS 41.21.190 — 41.21.194.

The purpose of AS

41.21.190

—

41.21.194

is to establish, subject to valid existing rights, the state-owned or acquired land and water described in AS

41.21.191

as the Fort Rousseau Causeway State Historical Park. The primary purposes of establishing the land and water areas described in AS

41.21.191

as the Fort Rousseau Causeway State Historical Park are to promote, support, and preserve public use by maintaining and protecting the area’s fish and wildlife habitat, cultural resources, and scenic values.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of AS

41.21.190

—

41.21.194

, see § 1, ch. 10, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 41.21.191.
Fort Rousseau Causeway State Historical Park established.

Except for upland, shoreland, tideland, and water overlying the land lying northeasterly of a line running parallel to and 1100 feet offset southwesterly from the runway centerline of the Sitka Airport, the upland, shoreland, tideland, and water overlying the land owned or acquired by the state within the following described parcels are established as the Fort Rousseau Causeway State Historical Park:

Township 56 South, Range 63 East, Copper River Meridian, described as:

The following lots located within United States Survey 3926:

Section 2: That portion of Lot 86 within Section 2

That portion of Lot 86A within Section 2

That portion of Lot 90 within Section 2

Lot 91

Lot 92

Section 3: E1/2SE1/4NW1/4NE1/4NW1/4

E1/2NE1/4SW1/4NE1/4NW1/4

NW1/4SE1/4NE1/4NW1/4

SW1/4NE1/4NE1/4NW1/4

Lot 74

Lot 75

Lot 75A

Lot 76

That portion of Lot 77 within Section 3

Lot 78

Lot 78A

Lot 79

Lot 80

Lot 80A

Lot 81

Lot 81A

Lot 82

Lot 82A

That portion of Lot 83 within Section 3

Lot 84

Lot 84A

Lot 85

Lot 85A

That portion of Lot 86 within Section 3

That portion of Lot 86A within Section 3

Lot 87

Lot 88

Lot 89

That portion of Lot 90 within Section 3

Section 4: That portion of Lot 77 within Section 4

That portion of Lot 83 within Section 4.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective March 31, 2010, in the introductory language, added, “Except for upland, shoreland, tideland, and water overlying the land lying northeasterly of a line running parallel to and 1100 feet offset southwesterly from the runway centerline of the Sitka Airport,”.

Sec. 41.21.192.
Designation of management responsibility.

The state-owned land and water described in AS

41.21.191

is assigned to the department for control, maintenance, and development consistent with the purposes and provisions of AS

41.21.190

—

41.21.194

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 2008)

Sec. 41.21.193.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner may designate by regulation incompatible uses within the land and water of the Fort Rousseau Causeway State Historical Park.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 2008)

Sec. 41.21.194.
Additions to park.

Land and water outside of the boundaries established under AS

41.21.191

may be added to the Fort Rousseau Causeway State Historical Park only by an act of the legislature.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 2008)